Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) A county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 may submit their housing element required under RCW 36.70A.070(2) and any housing development regulations adopted or amended on or after the effective date of this section to the department for review to determine whether the housing element or housing development regulations comply with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section.(2)(a) Not less than 120 days prior to applying for approval of a housing element, the county or city must notify the department in writing that it intends to apply for approval under subsection (1) of this section. The department shall review proposed housing elements prior to final adoption and advise the county or city of the actions necessary to receive approval.(b) Prior to advising the county or city of the actions necessary to receive approval under (a) of this subsection, the department, along with the county or city, may consult with other relevant state agencies in making its determination.(c) Prior to advising the county or city of the actions necessary to receive approval under (a) of this subsection, the department, along with the county or city, may consult with housing providers, developers, and builders that are located in or have completed work in the county or city.(d) The department shall publish notice in the Washington state register that a city or county has notified the department of its intent to apply for approval and the department shall post a copy of the notice on the department website.(3)(a) A county or city submitting a housing element or housing development regulation for review under subsection (1) of this section must submit its application to the department within 10 days after any final action to amend, repeal, or replace the housing element or housing development regulations.(b) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the department may review housing development regulations adopted or amended before the effective date of this section if amendments to those regulations are necessary to implement the housing element or any laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section.(4) Notwithstanding RCW 36.70A.320(1), a housing element or housing development regulation subject to review under this section does not take effect until the department issues a final decision determining that the housing element or housing development regulation complies with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section.(5)(a) An application for review must include, at a minimum, the following:(i) A cover letter from the legislative authority requesting review of the housing element or housing development regulations;(ii) A copy of the adopted ordinance or resolution taking the legislative action or actions required to adopt the housing element or housing development regulations;(iii) A statement explaining how the adopted housing element or housing development regulations comply with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section; and(iv) A copy of the record developed by the city or county at any public meeting or public hearing at which action was taken on the housing element or housing development regulations.(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "action" and "meeting" have the same meanings as in RCW 42.30.020.(6)(a) Within 90 days of the date of receipt of an application, the department shall issue a decision determining whether the housing element and any housing development regulations comply with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section. The department may extend the review period with written agreement of the city or county.(b) The department must issue its decision in the form of a written statement, including findings of fact and conclusions, and noting the date of the issuance of its decision. The department's issued decision must conspicuously and plainly state that it is the department's final decision. In issuing a decision that finds that a city's or county's housing element and any housing development regulations are not in compliance with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section, the department must demonstrate that the city's or county's housing element or development regulations are clearly erroneous.(c) The department shall promptly publish its decision as follows:(i) Notify the city or county in writing of its decision;(ii) Publish a notice of action in the Washington state register;(iii) Post a notice of its decision on the agency website; and(iv) Notify other relevant state agencies regarding the decision.(7)(a) The department shall issue a determination of compliance for a housing element or housing development regulation unless it finds that the housing element or housing development regulation is not consistent with any of the following laws and regulations:(i) The housing planning goal set forth in RCW 36.70A.020(4);(ii) The housing element requirements set forth in RCW 36.70A.070(2);(iii) Any relevant rules adopted by the department;(iv) Any relevant state environmental policy act requirements in chapter 43.21C RCW;(v) The county's or city's comprehensive plan;(vi) Emergency shelters, transitional housing, emergency housing, and permanent supportive housing requirements in RCW 35.21.683 and 35A.21.430;(vii) Co-living housing requirements in RCW 36.70A.535;(viii) Density bonuses required in RCW 36.70A.545;(ix) Parking requirements in RCW 36.70A.620 and 36.70A.622; or(x) Housing requirements in RCW 36.70A.115, 36.70A.635, 36.70A.636, 36.70A.637, 36.70A.638, 36.70A.680, 36.70A.681, 36.70A.682, 36.70A.696, 36.70A.697, 36.70A.698, and 36.70A.699.(b) Within six months of the effective date of this section, the department shall publish a defined set of minimum objective standards that jurisdictions must meet in order to comply with this section.(8)(a) The department shall publish and regularly update a local government compliance list that includes, at minimum, the following information for each city or county:(i) Whether the city or county is subject to a targeted review under subsection (9) of this section;(ii) Whether the city or county has applied for a determination of compliance and, if so, the date of the application; and(iii) Whether the department has issued a decision on compliance for the city or county and, if so, the nature of the decision, the date that the decision was issued, and the status or outcome of any appeals.(b) The local government compliance list must be made publicly available on the department's website.(9)(a)(i) A city or county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 must submit its housing element required under RCW 36.70A.070(2) and any housing development regulations adopted or amended on or after the effective date of this section to the department for review in accordance with this section if the department selects the city or county for targeted review under this subsection. The department may select up to 10 cities or counties for targeted review each calendar year and must prioritize selections for review based on criteria including, but not limited to, the following:(A) The city or county has not planned for and accommodated for its portion of the countywide housing need determined by the county;(B) The city's or county's housing production is less than 50 percent of the annual housing being produced within the county or regional council area, as applicable, adjusted by population;(C) The city's or county's housing production consists of greater than 80 percent single-family homes aimed at primarily households whose income is at or greater than 120 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size for the city or county where the household is located.(ii) Upon selection for review, the department must notify any selected cities or counties within 10 days.(iii) During review of a city or county under this subsection, the department may consult with housing developers and builders that are located in or have completed work in the city or county.(b)(i) If the department determines that a city or county subject to targeted review under this subsection is not in compliance with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section, the department shall notify the city or county of the deficiencies identified and propose amendments to correct any deficiencies. The city or county has 120 days to amend its housing element and any relevant housing development regulations to address any deficiencies noted by the department in its decision issued under subsection (6)(a) of this section and must submit any amendments to its housing element or housing development regulations to the department in the same manner of the initial application for review under subsection (5)(a) of this section. The department may extend the 120-day correction period with written agreement of the city or county.(ii) If the department determines that a housing element or housing development regulation amended under (b)(i) of this subsection does not comply with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section, the city or county is subject to the requirements of subsection (11) of this section.(10) The department's decision on compliance, including subsequent reviews under subsection (9)(b) of this section, and any housing element or housing development regulations subject to review under this section, may be appealed to the growth management hearings board by filing a petition as provided in RCW 36.70A.290.(11)(a) A noncompliant city or county may not deny an affordable or moderate-income housing development, or approve an affordable or moderate-income housing development with conditions or restrictions that have a substantial adverse impact on the viability of the development or the degree of affordability of the development unless at least one of the following conditions is met:(i) The city or county has received a final decision from the department determining that its housing element and any housing development regulations comply with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section;(ii) The denial of the affordable or moderate-income housing development, or the approval of the affordable or moderate-income housing development with conditions or restrictions that have a substantial adverse impact on the viability of the development or the degree of affordability of the development, is required in order to comply with specific state or federal law;(iii) The affordable or moderate-income housing development or proposed development site is located outside an urban growth area, in a critical area, in a critical area buffer, or in an area where residential uses are not allowed by the applicable shoreline master program; or(iv) The affordable or moderate-income housing development or proposed development site is located in an area where neither the local jurisdiction's comprehensive plan nor zoning ordinance permits residential or mixed uses.(b) The county or city must require the developer of an affordable or moderate-income housing development to include legally binding, enforceable restrictions on the development, recorded as a covenant or deed restriction, to ensure that the following measures of affordability are met for a minimum 25-year period:(i) At least 20 percent of the units are affordable housing as defined in RCW 36A.70A.030;(ii) At least 50 percent of the units are workforce housing; or(iii) All of the units are moderate-income housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.(c) The county or city must periodically audit compliance with the restrictions or provide another mechanism to ensure that the units committed to affordable or workforce housing meet the measures of affordability described in (b) of this subsection during the agreed term.(d) For the purposes of this subsection, "noncompliant city or county" means a city or county subject to targeted review under subsection (9) of this section that:(i) Does not take amendatory actions under subsection (9)(b)(i) of this section following a determination from the department that the city's or county's housing element or housing development regulations do not comply with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section; or(ii) Has a housing element or housing development regulation that does not comply with the laws and regulations identified in subsection (7) of this section as determined by the department under subsection (9)(b)(ii) of this section or, if appealed, the board under RCW 36.70A.290(3)(b).(12) A city or county may not be required to submit their housing element or housing development regulations for department review and compliance under this section as a condition of eligibility or prioritization for funds or other programs and opportunities unless a city or county is required to submit their housing element or housing development regulations under subsection (9)(a)(i) of this section.(13) The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.(14) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Affordable housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.(b) "Workforce housing" means housing with monthly costs, including utilities other than telephone, that do not exceed 30 percent of the monthly income of a household whose income is:(i) For a rental: At or below 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development;(ii) For ownership: At or below 100 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(c) "Moderate-income housing" has the same meaning as "moderate-income household" in RCW 36.70A.030.(d) "Housing development regulations" means any development regulations related to the housing element requirements under RCW 36.70A.070(2) including, but not limited to, development regulations related to affordable housing, middle housing, co-living housing, accessory dwelling units, emergency shelters, transitional housing, emergency housing, permanent supportive housing, conversions of nonresidential buildings to residential use, and any zoning maps and zoning districts.Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.280 and 2023 c 334 s 7, 2023 c 332 s 6, and 2023 c 228 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The growth management hearings board shall hear and determine only those petitions alleging either:(a) That, except as provided otherwise by this subsection, a state agency, county, or city planning under this chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to plans, development regulations, or amendments, adopted under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the board to hear petitions alleging noncompliance based on a city or county's actions taken to implement the requirements of RCW 36.70A.680 and 36.70A.681 within an urban growth area;(b) That the 20-year growth management planning population projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted;(c) That the approval of a work plan adopted under RCW 36.70A.735(1)(a) is not in compliance with the requirements of the program established under RCW 36.70A.710;(d) That regulations adopted under RCW 36.70A.735(1)(b) are not regionally applicable and cannot be adopted, wholly or partially, by another jurisdiction;(e) That a department certification under RCW 36.70A.735(1)(c) is erroneous;(f) That the department's final decision to approve or reject a proposed greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelement or amendments by a local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 was not in compliance with the joint guidance issued by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.45.120; ((or))(g) That the department's final decision to approve or reject actions by a city implementing RCW 36.70A.635 is clearly erroneous; or(h) That the department's determination of compliance of a housing element and any related housing development regulations under section 1 of this act is clearly erroneous.(2) A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on which a review is being requested; (c) a person who is certified by the governor within 60 days of filing the request with the board; or (d) a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.(3) For purposes of this section, "person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or entity of any character.(4) To establish participation standing under subsection (2)(b) of this section, a person must show that his or her participation before the county or city was reasonably related to the person's issue as presented to the board.(5) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management planning population projection prepared by the office of financial management, the board shall consider the implications of any such adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by the board must be documented and filed with the office of financial management within ten working days after adoption.If adjusted by the board, a county growth management planning population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set forth in this chapter and shall be known as the "board adjusted population projection." None of these changes shall affect the official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state budget and planning purposes.Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.290 and 2011 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All requests for review to the growth management hearings board shall be initiated by filing a petition that includes a detailed statement of issues presented for resolution by the board. The board shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings. The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing order.(2) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days after publication as provided in (a) through (((c)))(d) of this subsection.(a) Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection, the date of publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be published.(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto.Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection, for purposes of this section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto.(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided in RCW 90.58.090, the department of ecology shall publish a notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or disapproved. For purposes of this section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program is the date the department of ecology publishes notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or disapproved.(d) For purposes of this section, the date of publication for a housing element and any housing development regulations submitted to the department for review under section 1 of this act is the date the department publishes its final decision on compliance in the Washington State Register or on the department's website, whichever is later.(3)(a) All petitions relating to whether the department's final decision under section 1 of this act is clearly erroneous must be filed within 60 days after the department publishes its final decision in the Washington State Register or on the department's website, whichever is later.(b) A decision of the board concerning an appeal of the department's final decision under section 1 of this act must be based solely on whether the relevant housing element or housing development regulations comply with the laws and regulations identified in section 1(7) of this act.(4) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the petition, set a time for hearing the matter.(((4)))(5) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its decision.(((5)))(6) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the same development regulation or regulations.Sec. 4. RCW 36.70A.320 and 2023 c 228 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsections (5) ((and (6)))through (7) of this section, comprehensive plans and development regulations, and amendments thereto, adopted under this chapter are presumed valid upon adoption.(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the burden is on the petitioner to demonstrate that any action taken by a state agency, county, or city under this chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.(3) In any petition under this chapter, the board, after full consideration of the petition, shall determine whether there is compliance with the requirements of this chapter. In making its determination, the board shall consider the criteria adopted by the department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The board shall find compliance unless it determines that the action by the state agency, county, or city is clearly erroneous in view of the entire record before the board and in light of the goals and requirements of this chapter.(4) A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity made under RCW 36.70A.300 or 36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating that the ordinance or resolution it has enacted in response to the determination of invalidity will no longer substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter under the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1).(5) The shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the applicable development regulations adopted by a county or city shall take effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.(6) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelement required by RCW 36.70A.070 shall take effect as provided in RCW 36.70A.096.(7) Any housing element and any housing development regulations subject to review under section 1 of this act take effect as provided in section 1 of this act.Sec. 5. RCW 36.70A.130 and 2024 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.(b)(i) A city or town located within a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may opt out of a full review and revisions of its comprehensive plan established in this section if the city or town meets the following criteria:(A) Has a population fewer than 500;(B) Is not located within 10 miles of a city with a population over 100,000;(C) Experienced a population growth rate of fewer than 10 percent in the preceding 10 years; and(D) Has provided the department with notice of its intent to participate in a partial review and revision of its comprehensive plan.(ii) The department shall review the population growth rate for a city or town participating in the partial review and revision of its comprehensive plan process at least three years before the periodic update is due as outlined in subsection (4) of this section and notify cities of their eligibility.(iii) A city or town that opts out of a full review and revision of its comprehensive plan must update its critical areas regulations and its capital facilities element and its transportation element.(c) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and the reasons therefor.(d) The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include, but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population allocated to a city or county from the most recent 10-year population forecast by the office of financial management.(e) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan.(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW 36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise, if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section or in accordance with the provisions of subsection (6) of this section. Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year under the following circumstances:(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan. Subarea plans adopted under this subsection (2)(a)(i) must clarify, supplement, or implement jurisdiction-wide comprehensive plan policies, and may only be adopted if the cumulative impacts of the proposed plan are addressed by appropriate environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;(ii) The development of an initial subarea plan for economic development located outside of the 100 year floodplain in a county that has completed a state-funded pilot project that is based on watershed characterization and local habitat assessment;(iii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;(iv) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget; ((or))(v) The adoption of comprehensive plan amendments necessary to enact a planned action under RCW 43.21C.440, provided that amendments are considered in accordance with the public participation program established by the county or city under this subsection (2)(a) and all persons who have requested notice of a comprehensive plan update are given notice of the amendments and an opportunity to comment; or(vi) The adoption or amendment of any housing element necessary to receive a determination of compliance under section 1 of this act.(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal of a comprehensive plan filed with the growth management hearings board or with the court.(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, according to the schedules established in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, its designated urban growth area or areas, patterns of development occurring within the urban growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas.(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding 20-year period. The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.(c) If, during the county's review under (a) of this subsection, the county determines revision of the urban growth area is not required to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding 20-year period, but does determine that patterns of development have created pressure in areas that exceed available, developable lands within the urban growth area, the urban growth area or areas may be revised to accommodate identified patterns of development and likely future development pressure for the succeeding 20-year period if the following requirements are met:(i) The revised urban growth area may not result in an increase in the total surface areas of the urban growth area or areas;(ii) The areas added to the urban growth area are not or have not been designated as agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands of long-term commercial significance;(iii) Less than 15 percent of the areas added to the urban growth area are critical areas;(iv) The areas added to the urban growth areas are suitable for urban growth;(v) The transportation element and capital facility plan element have identified the transportation facilities, and public facilities and services needed to serve the urban growth area and the funding to provide the transportation facilities and public facilities and services;(vi) The urban growth area is not larger than needed to accommodate the growth planned for the succeeding 20-year planning period and a reasonable land market supply factor;(vii) The areas removed from the urban growth area do not include urban growth or urban densities; and(viii) The revised urban growth area is contiguous, does not include holes or gaps, and will not increase pressures to urbanize rural or natural resource lands.(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (8) of this section, counties and cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:(a) On or before June 30, 2015, for King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and the cities within those counties;(b) On or before June 30, 2016, for Clallam, Clark, Island, Jefferson, Kitsap, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;(c) On or before June 30, 2017, for Benton, Chelan, Cowlitz, Douglas, Kittitas, Lewis, Skamania, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and(d) On or before June 30, 2018, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities within those counties.(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (8) of this section, following the review of comprehensive plans and development regulations required by subsection (4) of this section, counties and cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:(a) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, on or before December 31, 2024, with the following review and, if needed, revision on or before June 30, 2034, and then every 10 years thereafter, for King, Kitsap, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and the cities within those counties;(b) On or before December 31, 2025, with the following review and, if needed, revision on or before June 30, 2035, and then every 10 years thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Island, Jefferson, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;(c) On or before June 30, 2026, and every 10 years thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Cowlitz, Douglas, Franklin, Kittitas, Skamania, Spokane, Walla Walla, and Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and(d) On or before June 30, 2027, and every 10 years thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Garfield, Grant, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, and Whitman counties and the cities within those counties.(6)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before the deadlines established in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they elect to do so.(b) A county that is subject to a deadline established in subsection (5)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the 24 months following the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section: The county has a population of less than 50,000 and has had its population increase by no more than 17 percent in the 10 years preceding the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section as of that date.(c) A city that is subject to a deadline established in subsection (5)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the 24 months following the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section: The city has a population of no more than 5,000 and has had its population increase by the greater of either no more than 100 persons or no more than 17 percent in the 10 years preceding the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section as of that date.(d) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances, comprehensive plans, and development regulations.(7)(a) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities that meet the following criteria may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees under chapter 43.155 or 70A.135 RCW:(i) ((Complying))The county or city is in compliance with the deadlines in this section; ((or))(ii) ((Demonstrating))The county or city demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the ((schedules))deadlines in this section for development regulations that protect critical areas. (((b) A))For the purposes of this subsection (7)(a)(ii), a county or city that is fewer than 12 months out of compliance with the ((schedules))deadlines in this section for development regulations that protect critical areas is making substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section; or(iii) The county or city demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section for any housing element and any housing development regulations required to be submitted to the department for review under section 1 of this act. For the purposes of this subsection (7)(a)(iii), a county or city that applies to the department for review within the timelines specified under section 1 of this act demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section and is eligible for grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees under chapter 43.155 or 70A.135 RCW until the department or the growth management hearings board issues a final decision determining that the county's or city's housing element or any related housing development regulations are not in compliance with the laws and regulations identified in section 1(7) of this act.(b) Only those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules in this section may receive preference for grants or loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.17.250.(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, if a participating watershed is achieving benchmarks and goals for the protection of critical areas functions and values, the county is not required to update development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in that watershed.(b) A county that has made the election under RCW 36.70A.710(1) may only adopt or amend development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in a participating watershed if:(i) A work plan has been approved for that watershed in accordance with RCW 36.70A.725;(ii) The local watershed group for that watershed has requested the county to adopt or amend development regulations as part of a work plan developed under RCW 36.70A.720;(iii) The adoption or amendment of the development regulations is necessary to enable the county to respond to an order of the growth management hearings board or court;(iv) The adoption or amendment of development regulations is necessary to address a threat to human health or safety; or(v) Three or more years have elapsed since the receipt of funding.(c) Beginning 10 years from the date of receipt of funding, a county that has made the election under RCW 36.70A.710(1) must review and, if necessary, revise development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in a participating watershed in accordance with the review and revision requirements and timeline in subsection (5) of this section. This subsection (8)(c) does not apply to a participating watershed that has determined under RCW 36.70A.720(2)(c)(ii) that the watershed's goals and benchmarks for protection have been met.(9)(a) Counties subject to planning deadlines established in subsection (5) of this section that are required or that choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and that meet either criteria of (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, and cities with a population of more than 6,000 as of April 1, 2021, within those counties, must provide to the department an implementation progress report detailing the progress they have achieved in implementing their comprehensive plan five years after the review and revision of their comprehensive plan. Once a county meets the criteria in (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, the implementation progress report requirements remain in effect thereafter for that county and the cities therein with populations greater than 6,000 as of April 1, 2021, even if the county later no longer meets either or both criteria. A county is subject to the implementation progress report requirement if it meets either of the following criteria on or after April 1, 2021:(i) The county has a population density of at least 100 people per square mile and a population of at least 200,000; or(ii) The county has a population density of at least 75 people per square mile and an annual growth rate of at least 1.75 percent as determined by the office of financial management.(b) The department shall adopt guidelines for indicators, measures, milestones, and criteria for use by counties and cities in the implementation progress report that must cover:(i) The implementation of previously adopted changes to the housing element and any effect those changes have had on housing affordability and availability within the jurisdiction;(ii) Permit processing timelines; and(iii) Progress toward implementing any actions required to achieve reductions to meet greenhouse gas and vehicle miles traveled requirements as provided for in any element of the comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.070.(c) If a city or county required to provide an implementation progress report under this subsection (9) has not implemented any specifically identified regulations, zoning and land use changes, or taken other legislative or administrative action necessary to implement any changes in the most recent periodic update in their comprehensive plan by the due date for the implementation progress report, the city or county must identify the need for such action in the implementation progress report. Cities and counties must adopt a work plan to implement any necessary regulations, zoning and land use changes, or take other legislative or administrative action identified in the implementation progress report and complete all work necessary for implementation within two years of submission of the implementation progress report.(10) Any county or city that is required by RCW 36.70A.095 to include in its comprehensive plan a climate change and resiliency element and that is also required by subsection (5)(a) of this section to review and, if necessary, revise its comprehensive plan on or before December 31, 2024, must update its transportation element and incorporate a climate change and resiliency element into its comprehensive plan as part of the first implementation progress report required by subsection (9) of this section if funds are appropriated and distributed by December 31, 2027, as required under RCW 36.70A.070(10).Sec. 6. RCW 43.21C.495 and 2023 c 334 s 6 and 2023 c 332 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Adoption of ordinances, development regulations and amendments to such regulations, and other nonproject actions taken by a city to implement: The actions specified in section 2, chapter 246, Laws of 2022 unless the adoption of such ordinances, development regulations and amendments to such regulations, or other nonproject actions has a probable significant adverse impact on fish habitat; and the increased residential building capacity actions identified in RCW 36.70A.600(1), with the exception of the action specified in RCW 36.70A.600(1)(f), are not subject to administrative or judicial appeals under this chapter.(2) Amendments to development regulations and other nonproject actions taken by a city to implement the requirements under RCW 36.70A.635 pursuant to RCW 36.70A.636(3)(b) are not subject to administrative or judicial appeals under this chapter.(3) Adoption of ordinances, development regulations and amendments to such regulations, and other nonproject actions taken by a city or county consistent with the requirements of RCW 36.70A.680 and 36.70A.681 are not subject to administrative or judicial appeals under this chapter.(4) Adoption of ordinances, development regulations and amendments to such regulations, and other nonproject actions by a city or county to implement the housing element requirements set forth in RCW 36.70A.070(2) are not subject to administrative or judicial appeals under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:The state, through the department and the attorney general, shall represent its interest before agencies of the United States, interstate agencies, and the courts with regard to comprehensive plans, regulations, activities, or uses approved under this act. Where federal or interstate agency plans, activities, or procedures conflict with state policies, all reasonable steps available shall be taken by the state to preserve the integrity of its policies.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. This act may be known and cited as the housing accountability act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---